Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
FRUITS, VEGETABLES, AND COFFEE

§148-1 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Chairperson" means chairperson of
the board of agriculture or the chairperson's authorized agents.

"Department" means the department of
agriculture.

"Fresh fruits, fresh vegetables, and
coffee" means any fresh fruit, fresh vegetable and coffee whether imported
or produced in the State. [L 1961, c 73, §1 and c 132, §2; am L 1963, c 206,
§2; Supp, §22C-1; HRS §148-1; am L 1969, c 72, §1; gen ch 1985, 1993]

Revision Note

Numeric designations
deleted and definitions rearranged.

Cross References

Grades and standards,
see chapter 147.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next